Colorado, session 2026A, HB1354.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-2-146.8, amend
(4)(b); and add (5) as follows:
22-2-146.8. Department of education - improving science
outcomes - teacher professional development - report - appropriation
- legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(4) (b) For the 2024-25 budget year, the general assembly shall
appropriate three million dollars from the state education fund to the
department. Any money appropriated pursuant to this section FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION FOR THE 2024-25 BUDGET YEAR that is not
expended prior to July 1, 2025, remains available for expenditure for the
same purpose in the 2026-27 budget year without further appropriation. At
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

the end of the 2026-27 budget year, the money that is unexpended or
unencumbered reverts to the state education fund.
(5) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, amend section 3
of chapter 239 (HB 24-1446) as follows:
Section 3. Appropriation. For the 2024-25 state fiscal year,
$3,000,000 $1,500,000 is appropriated to the department of education for
use by student learning. This appropriation is from the state education fund
created in section 17 (4)(a) of article IX of the state constitution. To
implement this act, the division may use this appropriation for professional
development for science teachers.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1354

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1354